Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1433YC (2) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 261J.1, subsection 3, as enacted by 1 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1152, section 31, is amended to read 2 as follows: 3 3. âPublic institution of higher educationâ means an 4 institution of higher learning governed by the state board of 5 regents or a community college . 6